Massachusetts, session 194th, H3141.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5I of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following:-
In those cities and towns in which an exemption is made available hereunder, the local
governing body may provide an exemption for parcels with multiple commercial occupants if at
least 50 percent of the occupants are eligible businesses. If the parcel is a multiple use property
consisting of both residential and commercial occupants, the local governing body may provide
an exemption if at least 50 percent of the commercial portion of the parcel is comprised of
eligible businesses.
of 1